North Dakota, session 69, HB1341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-17-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-17-01. Simple assault.
1. A person is guilty of an offense if that person:
a. Willfully causes bodily injury to another human being; or
b. Negligently causes bodily injury to another human being by means of a firearm,
destructive device, or other weapon, the use of which against a human being is likely to
cause death or serious bodily injury.
2. The offense is:
a. A class C felony when the victim is a peace officer or correctional institution employee
acting in an official capacity, which the actor knows to be a fact; an employee of the state
hospital acting in the course and scope of employment, which the actor knows to be a
fact, and the actor is an individual committed to or detained at the state hospital pursuant
to chapter 25-03.3; a person engaged in a judicial proceeding; or a member of a
municipal or volunteer fire department or emergency medical services personnel unit, or
emergency department worker or hospital worker, engaged in essential patient care, in
the performance of the member's duties.
b. A class B misdemeanor except as provided in subdivision a.

H. B. NO. 1341 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1341.
House Vote: Yeas 68 Nays 21 Absent 5
Senate Vote: Yeas 37 Nays 8 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State